Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 5 Commission on Interstate Cooperation
the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission created by Section 1 of Act 227 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1404.1, formerly the Arkansas Environmental Preservation Commission created by Section 4 of Act 112 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1404;

the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee, created by Section 5 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-925;

the Office of the Arkansas State Arts and Humanities of the Department of Planning, created by Section 3 of Act 359 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-1003, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904, which was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Board of Registration for Foresters, created by Section 4 of Act 535 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2404;

the Judicial Department, created by Section 1 of Act 496 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-142;

the Justice Building Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 375 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-602;

the Commission on Uniform State Laws, created by Section 1 of Act 159 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-401;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, created by Section 2 of Act 113 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1302.1;

the Prosecution Coordination Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 925 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 24-127;

the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy, created by Section 2 of Act 160 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-612;

the Revenue Department Building Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 38 of 1961 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes Title 13 Appendix 12;

the Soybean Promotion Board, created by Section 2 of Act 259 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 77-2002;

the Saint Francis Levee District, created pursuant to Section 1 of Act 75 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-644;

the Southern Interstate Nuclear Board, created by Section 1 of Act 429 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1101, renamed the Southern State Energy Board by Section 1 of Act 1112 of 1979, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-1101;

the Office on Aging, as transferred to the Department of Human Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Ark. Stats. 5-904;

the Arkansas Veterans Service Office, created by Section 1 of Act 234 of 1945, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1401; transferred to the Department of Veterans Affairs by Section 11 of Act 324 of 1979, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1410;

the Arkansas Veterans Child Welfare Service, created by Section 1 of Act 189 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1409;

the Air National Guard, created by Section 23 of Act 50 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-203;

the Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, created by Section 3 of Act 202 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1003;

the Office of the Adjutant General, created by Section 10 of Act 50 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-110;

the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, as transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914 and transferred to the State Military Department by Section 5 of Act 45 of 1981;

the State Militia, created by Section 2 of Act 85 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-102, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914 and transferred to the State Military Department by Section 5 of Act 45 of 1981;

the Office of Emergency Services, created as a Division of the Department of Public Safety by Section 5 of Act 511 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1938, and reestablished as a separate State agency by Section 10 of Act 45 of 1981;

the Arkansas Police Commission created by Section 2 of Act 231 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statute 42-402;

the Office of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention of the Department of Human Services created by Section 1 of Act 644 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statute 82-2132, and which succeeded to the authority of the Office on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism created by Section 3 of 50 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statute 83-720;

the Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Advisory Council created by Section 5 of Act 644 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statute 82-2136, and which succeeded to the authority of the Alcohol Abuse Advisory Council created by Section 4 of Act 50 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statute 83-721;

the Arkansas Crime Commission created by Section 1 of Act 558 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statute 6-1301, and which succeeded to the authority of the Crime and Law Enforcement Commission created by Executive Order 75-1;

the Arkansas Student Loan Authority created by Section 3 of Act 873 of 1977, the same being Arkansas Statute 80-4033, which succeeded to the authority of the Student Loan Board created by Section 3 of Act 884 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statute 80-4018;

SECTION 3. The following state agencies, which, under the provisions of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977 and Section 3 of Act 684 of 1979, were scheduled to terminate on June 30, 1979, are hereby continued until June 30, 1983, for the purpose of enabling the appropriate Joint Interim Committee of the General Assembly, as designated below, to continue to review said state agencies for the purpose of recommending to the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly whether said state agencies should continue to function after June 30, 1983, or terminate on said date as provided herein:

SECTION 4. (a) The following subsections of Section 4 of Act 100 of 1977 are hereby repealed: subsections (1) and (2) of subsection (a); subsections (5) and (6) of subsection (a); subsection (8) of subsection (a); subsections (10) through (13) of subsection (a); subsections (1) through (20) of subsection (b); subsections (22) through (28) of subsection (b); subsections (1) and (2) of subsection (c); subsection (1) of subsection (d); subsections (3) through (19) of subsection (d); subsections (1) through (3) of subsection (e); subsections (5) through (7) of subsection (e); subsections (1) through (5) of subsection (f); and subsections (8) through (17) of subsection (f).

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 100 of 1977, Act 683 of 1979 and Act 1021 of 1979 provided for the termination of a number of State agencies and programs to be effective on June 30, 1981; that it was the intention of said Acts that each of said agencies and programs would be reviewed in the interim between the recess and adjournment and the convening of the Seventy-Third General Assembly by the Legislative Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly to evaluate the purposes, duties and accomplishments of said agencies and programs with the view that the General Assembly would take action to restore and continue those agencies and programs that were needed in the public interests; that other agencies and programs would be reorganized and that other agencies and programs would be allowed to terminate as provided by said Acts; and, as a result of said studies during the interim prior to the convening of the Seventy-Third General Assembly recommendations have been made to restore and continue the operations of numerous agencies and programs which were to terminate on June 30, 1981, and recommendations were made that other agencies and programs be extended for two more years for further study and to terminate on June 30, 1983 unless restored and continued by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly; that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to restore and continue the various agencies and programs identified in this Act and that said action should be taken prior to June 30, 1981, at which time said agencies would be terminated under the provisions of said Acts, it being the intent of this Act that the agencies and programs defined herein would continue to function. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

APPROVED: March 28, 1981.

SECTION 1. PURPOSE. In the passage of this Act, the General Assembly is cognizant of the intent of Section 5 of Act 100 of 1977 and Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981, which provided for the termination of a number of state agencies on June 30, 1983 unless studies of said state agencies by joint interim committees of the General Assembly, who were assigned in said Acts to make “Sunset reviews” of said agencies, determine that the continuation of certain of said state agencies is in the public interest. During the interim between the adoption of Act 100 of 1977, and Act 883 of 1981, and the convening of the 1983 Regular Session of the General Assembly, the respective joint interim committees of the General Assembly have made studies and review of the purposes, activities, justifications, and needs for each of the state agencies enumerated in Section 5 of Act 100 of 1977, Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981, and have recommended the continuation of a number of said state agencies in their present form. It is, therefore, the purpose of this Act to provide for the continuation of certain state agencies, subsequent to June 30, 1981, and to provide that the provisions of Section 5 of Act 100 of 1977, and Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981, which would have provided for the termination of the state agencies enumerated herein on June 30, 1983, shall be of no effect, and that said state agencies be continued in their present form and under their present names, and such state agencies or their successor agencies shall continue to function the same as if the provisions of Act 100 of 1977 and Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981, which provided for the termination of the state agencies enumerated herein, had never been enacted.

SECTION 2. The following state agencies, which under the provisions of Section 5 of Act 100 of 1977 or Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981, were scheduled to terminate on June 30, 1983, are hereby continued in their present form and under their present names, and said state agencies, or their successor agencies, shall continue to function and shall perform the respective powers, functions, and duties assigned to them by law from and after June 30, 1983, the same as they would have functioned if Act 100 of 1977 and Section 3 of Act 883 of 1981 had never been enacted:

SECTION 3. This Act shall not have the effect of recreating any agency which has been abolished before the effective date of this Act.

SECTION 4. All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are hereby repealed.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 100 of 1977 and Act 883 of 1981 provided for the termination of a number of State agencies and programs to be effective on June 30, 1983, that it was the intention of said Acts that each of said agencies and programs would be reviewed in the interim between the recess and adjournment and the convening of the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly by the Legislative Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly to evaluate the purposes, duties and accomplishments of said agencies and programs with the view that the General Assembly would take action to continue in their present form those agencies and programs that were needed in the public interests; that other agencies and programs would be reorganized and that other agencies and programs would be allowed to terminate as provided by said Acts; and, as a result of said studies during the interim prior to the convening of the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly recommendations have been made to continue the operations of numerous agencies and programs which were to terminate on June 30, 1983; that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to continue the various agencies and programs identified in this Act and that said action should be taken prior to June 30, 1983, at which time said agencies would be terminated under the provisions of said Acts, it being the intent of this Act that the agencies and programs defined herein would continue to function in their present form. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

APPROVED: March 24, 1983.